Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.110

Officials' violations.

If any county auditor or registration assistant, including government agency employees providing voter registration services under the requirements of state law or the national voter registration act of 1993:

(1) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform any duty required by law in connection with the registration of voters; or

(2) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty in the manner required by voter registration law; or

(3) Enters or causes or permits to be entered on the voter registration records the name of any person in any other manner or at any other time than as prescribed by voter registration law or enters or causes or permits to be entered on such records the name of any person not entitled to be thereon; or

(4) Destroys, mutilates, conceals, changes, or alters any registration record in connection therewith except as authorized by voter registration law,

that person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2023 c 466 s 33; 2003 c 111 s 2105. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 24; 1991 c 81 s 11; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.190; prior: 1933 c 1 s 26; RRS s 5114-26; prior: 1889 p 418 s 15; RRS s 5133. Formerly RCW 29.07.400, 29.85.190.]

NOTES:

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.